Colorado statutes. TITLE 29 Government - Local
PART 4
ASSOCIATIONS OF POLITICAL SUBDIVISIONS

29-1-401. Associations formed - purpose.

Two or more of the political subdivisions of the state may, in their discretion and in addition to powers granted before April 22, 1957, form and maintain associations for the purposes of promoting through investigation, discussion, and cooperative effort interests and welfare of the several political subdivisions of the state of Colorado and to promote a closer relation between the several political subdivisions of the state.

Source:

L. 57:

p. 522, § 1.

CRS 53:

§ 88-3-1.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 88-4-1.

29-1-402. Instrumentality of subdivision.

Any such association so formed shall be an instrumentality of the political subdivisions which are members thereof.

Source:

L. 57:

p. 522, § 2.

CRS 53:

§ 88-3-2.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 88-4-2.

29-1-403. Legislative representation - expenses - definitions.

The legislative bodies of local, political subdivisions may enter into associations and, through a representative of the association, attend the general assembly of the state of Colorado and the United States Congress and any committees thereof, and present information to aid the passage of legislation which the association deems beneficial to the local agencies in the association or to prevent the passage of legislation which the association deems detrimental to the local agencies in the association. The cost and expense incident thereto are proper charges against the local agencies comprising the association; but proper expenditures of the association shall include only the actual and necessary expenses for one representative of each association and shall not include any expenditures for expenses, travel, or entertainment of any persons other than the representative of the association.

"Local agency", as used in this part 4, means county, city, or city and county. "Legislative body", as used in this part 4, means board of county commissioners in the case of a county or city and county and city council or board of trustees in the case of a city or town.

Source:

L. 57:

p. 522, § 3.

CRS 53:

§ 88-3-3.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 88-4-3.

L. 72:

p. 611, § 128.